Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-123.03
Beer wholesale license; rights of licensee; designated territory.

A beer wholesale license shall (1) allow the wholesale purchase, importation, and storage of beer and sale, including delivery, of the brand or brands described in such license to licensees in this state in the sales territory prescribed in the license for each brand and to such persons outside the state as may be permitted by law, (2) allow the licensed wholesaler to do all things incident to the carrying on of the wholesale beer business, including the sampling of tax-paid beer upon the premises of the licensed wholesaler by a licensed retailer in the manner prescribed by the commission, and (3) allow the sampling of tax-paid beer upon the premises of any retailer, whether the license permits consumption on or off the licensed premises, or both, in a manner prescribed by the commission.

The sampling authorized under subdivision (3) of this section shall be limited to persons licensed as wholesalers or retailers and their employees.

The license shall designate the territory within which the licensed wholesaler may sell the designated product of any brewer as agreed upon by the licensee and the brewer.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 25, p. 390;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-325;

R.S.1943, § 53-123;

Laws 1947, c. 187, § 1(3), p. 617;

Laws 1947, c. 188, § 1(3), p. 622;

Laws 1963, c. 310, § 5, p. 926;

Laws 1971, LB 234, § 18;

Laws 1976, LB 204, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 848, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 133, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 205, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 11.